Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 4 Service Creditable

47-23-60.
Transfer of service credits.

Any creditable service credited to any member of this retirement system pursuant to a predecessor retirement system shall be deemed to be creditable service for the purposes of this chapter, effective July 1, 1998.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-61.
Establishing creditable service.

Any member who on June 30, 1998, was entitled to receive creditable service for prior service as a state court judge, state court solicitor-general, or juvenile court judge pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 47-9-41.1, as such Code section appeared on June 30, 1998, shall be entitled to establish creditable service under this retirement system, under the same conditions, for such prior service rendered prior to July 1, 1998. This Code section shall not apply to any other member of this retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-62.
Obtaining creditable service; obtaining creditable service in other systems; calculations.

Any member who became a member on July 1, 1998, and any member who becomes a member after that date may receive creditable service for the number of years he or she contributed to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia pursuant to Code Section 47-2-262.

In order to obtain the creditable service as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the member shall notify the board of directors of this retirement system and the board of trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia not later than December 31, 1998, or within 90 days after first becoming a member of this retirement system, whichever date is later. Upon such notice, the board of trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall verify the amount of allowable time to the board of trustees of this retirement system. If the requesting member has withdrawn his or her contributions from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the board of trustees of such retirement system shall certify the amount of employee contributions and regular interest thereon which had been credited to the member’s account, and the member shall within six months after such certification pay such amount to the board of trustees of this retirement system, together with regular interest thereon from the date of withdrawal to the date of payment. If the requesting member has not withdrawn his or her contributions from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the board of trustees of such retirement system shall transfer to the board of trustees of this retirement system the employee contributions together with regular interest thereon and shall refund to the member any employee contribution he or she paid to such retirement system for any creditable service not allowed by the retirement system. Upon receipt of such funds, the board of trustees of this retirement system shall credit the member with the number of years of creditable service so authorized.

Any member may receive creditable service for the number of years he or she would have contributed to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia pursuant to Code Section 47-2-262 but for the fact that he or she made the election not to become a member of such retirement system.

In order to obtain the creditable service as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the member shall notify the board of directors of this retirement system and the board of trustees of this retirement system not later than December 31, 1998, or within 90 days after first becoming a member of this retirement system, whichever date is later, providing such evidence that he or she was eligible for membership in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia as the board deems necessary. Within six months after such notification, the member shall pay to the board of trustees of this retirement system the employer and employee contributions which would have been paid by or on behalf of such member if he or she had elected to become a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, together with regular interest thereon.

No creditable service may be obtained pursuant to the provisions of this Code section for any period for which creditable service has or may be obtained in any other state or local public retirement system.

No creditable service obtained pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall be calculated in determining the minimum number of years of creditable service required for retirement pursuant to Article 6 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-63.
Definition and effect of full-time and part-time service; calculations.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Full-time service” means any service in a covered position during which such member was generally prohibited from the practice of law by virtue of holding such position.

“Part-time service” means any service in a covered position during which such member was not generally prohibited from the practice of law by virtue of holding such position.

Any member who, on the effective date of his or her retirement, was serving in a part-time position shall be entitled to use all of his or her prior service credit for purposes of vesting for benefits and for the calculation of benefits.

Any member who on the effective date of his or her retirement was serving in a full-time position shall be entitled to use any prior part-time service for vesting for benefits and shall be entitled to use such prior service for the calculation of benefits on the basis of a ratio determined by dividing the average monthly compensation for the 24 consecutive month period producing the highest such average during the part-time service by the average monthly salary during the 24 consecutive month period producing the highest such average during the full-time service. The resultant percentage will be multiplied by the total part-time service and the result added to the total full-time service, resulting in the total service to be used in all benefit calculations.

Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section to the contrary, any member who became a member pursuant to Code Section 47-23-40 shall be entitled to calculate his or her service as provided in the predecessor retirement system of which he or she was a member.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-63

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 353, § 1/HB 605.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted the present provisions of subsection (c) for the former provisions, which read: “Any member who on the effective date of his or her retirement was serving in a full-time position shall not be entitled to use any prior part-time service for vesting for benefits and shall be entitled to use such prior service for the calculation of benefits on the basis of one month of credit for each three months of prior part-time service.”

47-23-64.
Transfer of funds from Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia by judges, solicitor general, or district attorneys; crediting service.

Any superior court judge, state court judge, solicitor general, or district attorney who was previously an active member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia may elect to have all contributions made by or on behalf of such member transferred from such retirement system to this retirement system. Any such member shall notify the board of trustees of each retirement system not later than December 31, 2002, or within 90 days after first becoming a member of this retirement system, whichever date is later.

If the member subject to this subsection has not withdrawn his or her employee contributions from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, then upon receipt of the notice provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall transfer to the board of trustees of this retirement system all employer and employee contributions paid by or on behalf of the employee, together with regular interest thereon.

If the member subject to this subsection has withdrawn his or her employee contributions from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, then at the time of giving the notice provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the member shall pay to the board of trustees of this retirement system the total of such contributions, together with regular interest thereon. Upon receipt of such notice and payment of such amount, the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall transfer to the board of trustees of this retirement system all employer contributions paid on behalf of the employee, together with regular interest thereon.

The member subject to this subsection is authorized, but not required, to pay to the board of trustees such funds in addition to the amounts provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection as the member desires.

Upon receipt of the funds provided for in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the board of trustees of this retirement system shall credit the member with only the number of years of creditable service, not to exceed the actual years of prior service, as the amount so transferred or paid will warrant without creating any accrued liability as to this retirement system, calculated as if the member had either elected or rejected spouse’s survivors benefits, at the election of the member.

No creditable service may be obtained pursuant to the provisions of this Code section for any period for which creditable service has been or may be obtained in any other state or local public retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1691, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1488, § 1.

47-23-65.
Creditable service for certain prior service.

Any superior court judge or district attorney who is an active member of this retirement system may receive up to five years of creditable service for his or her past service as a circuit-paid assistant district attorney who was not eligible to participate in a local retirement plan upon payment to the board of trustees of an amount which will allow such creditable service without creating any accrued actuarial unfunded liability as to this retirement system. Any member desiring such creditable service shall make application to the board of trustees in such form as the board deems appropriate, provide such proof of eligible prior service as the board deems necessary, and make full payment not later than December 31, 2008, or within six months of first or again becoming a member, whichever is later. No creditable service shall be allowed under this Code section for any period of employment for which creditable service is allowed under any provision of any other retirement or pension system of this state or of any political subdivision of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-65

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1005, § 3/SB 328.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2008.